Virginia statutes. Title 57. Religious and Charitable Matters; Cemeteries.
Chapter 5. Solicitation of Contributions.
§ 57-63.
Local ordinances.

The governing body of any city, town or county may by ordinance not inconsistent with this chapter provide for the regulation and licensing of charitable or civic organizations soliciting within the city, town or county, and for penalties for violation thereof, subject to the following limitations:

No local license tax or fee in excess of ten dollars shall be required of any charitable organization.

No charitable organization exempt from registration under subdivision A 1, A 4, A 6 or A 7 of §

57-60

shall be required to be licensed. Any such organization may obtain a local license, without payment of any license tax or fee, upon compliance with all such requirements of the local ordinance as would have been applicable had it been registered with the Commissioner during each year in which it obtained an exemption letter under subsection C of §

57-60

.

No charitable organization that has registered with the Commissioner for the current and next preceding three years, or exempt for such years under §

57-50

, shall be required to provide any financial information.

No charitable or civic organization that solicits within the Commonwealth from a place outside the Commonwealth solely by telephone, telegraph, direct mail or advertising in national media, and having no chapter, branch, area or office within the Commonwealth, shall be required to be licensed.

No museum that has registered with the Commissioner as required by §

57-49

and that has been granted tax-exempt status under § 501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be required to comply with the regulation or licensing provisions of any local charitable solicitations ordinance.

If a charitable or civic organization shall designate by power of attorney filed with the Commissioner one or more persons authorized to sign on its behalf, the signature, verification or affirmation of any such persons shall be sufficient for all purposes of any local charitable solicitations ordinance.

Any ordinance adopted pursuant to this section may provide, inter alia, for procedures whereby charitable organizations may, for valid reasons, after an administrative hearing, be denied a local license or whereby a license may be revoked. Valid reasons for denial or revocation of a local license may be defined to include, without limitation, the expenditure of charitable assets for noncharitable purposes, any misrepresentation to the public or to any prospective donor, and any violation of state or local law. Any charitable organization which is denied a license may, within fifteen days from the date of such denial, apply for relief to the circuit court of such city or county or of the county in which such town is located. If the court is satisfied that the denial was for any reason erroneous, it shall provide such relief as may be appropriate.

No ordinance, or amendment thereto, adopted pursuant to this section shall be valid for any calendar year beginning after December 31, 1978, unless, before September 1 of that year, there shall have been filed with the Commissioner, on forms to be prescribed by him, information deemed by him to be sufficient for the purpose of advising charitable or civic organizations of the necessity for them to be licensed by such city, town or county.

No charitable organization shall be required to comply with the provisions of local ordinances if such organization has registered with the Commissioner or if such organization is a chapter, branch or affiliate included in the consolidated report of an organization or federated organization registered with the Commissioner, except that such charitable organization shall not be exempted from that portion of any local ordinance that requires such organization to register its name, the names of its solicitors and the dates and times that they will be soliciting in the locality.

History.

1974, c. 574; 1977, c. 401; 1979, cc. 55, 595; 1983, cc. 282, 374; 1985, c. 82; 1998, cc. 104, 232; 2002, c. 85.

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendment by c. 104, in subsection A, in subdivision 2, in the first sentence, inserted “subsection A 1, A 4, or A 6 of,” and deleted “(a) (1) or (4) or (6)” following “§

57-60

,” and in the second sentence, substituted “subsection C of §

57-60

” for “§ 57-60 (c),” and in subdivision 4, substituted “within the Commonwealth” for “within this Commonwealth” in two places.

The 1998 amendment by c. 232, in subsection A, in subdivision 2, in the first sentence, substituted “subdivision A 1, A 4 or A 6 of §

57-60

” for “§

57-60

(a) or (4) or (6).”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 85 substituted “A. 4., A. 6. or A. 7. of §

57-60

” for “A. 4. or A. 6. of §

57-60

” in subdivision A 2; and substituted “that” for “which” in subdivisions A 3 through A 5 and in subsection D.

§ 57-64.
Out-of-state enforcement proceedings.

Any state of the United States shall have the right to sue in the courts of Virginia to enforce the civil provisions of any statute thereof general in application regulating charitable solicitations, when the like right is accorded this Commonwealth by such state, whether such right is granted by statutory authority or as a matter of comity.

History.

1974, c. 574.

§ 57-65.
Fees and charges.

All fees and charges collected by the Commissioner as provided in this chapter shall be paid into a special fund of the state treasury. Such funds shall be used to finance the administration and operation of this program.

History.

1974, c. 574; 1975, c. 221; 1979, c. 595; 1984, c. 268.

§ 57-66.
Rules and regulations; model ordinance.

The Board shall have the power to make and publish reasonable rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter, or other applicable laws, or the Constitution of the Commonwealth, or the Constitution of the United States, for the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter and for the achievement of uniform regulation of charitable solicitations throughout the Commonwealth. The Commissioner shall promulgate a model ordinance which may be used by localities in their regulation of charitable solicitations.

History.

1974, c. 574; 1979, c. 595.

§ 57-67.
Application to court for relief.

Any person aggrieved by any final order of the Commissioner is entitled to judicial review in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). Either party may appeal any final order of such court to the Court of Appeals in the same manner as provided by law in cases of appeals of right.

History.

1974, c. 574; 1979, c. 595; 1984, c. 703; 1986, c. 615.

§ 57-68.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

57-68

, pertaining to severability, derived from 1974, c. 574.

§ 57-69.
Effective date.

Notwithstanding any other section of this chapter to the contrary, no charitable organization, professional fund-raising counsel, or professional solicitor shall be required to register with the Commissioner hereunder until July 1, 1978.

History.

1975, c. 221; 1977, c. 401; 1979, c. 595.